dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.fat.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- gerfux; g; 2 -->
    <pardef n="g/erfux__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erfux</l>
          <r>erfux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>riefex</l>
          <r>erfux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- seqer; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/eqer__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eqer</l>
          <r>eqer<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iqra</l>
          <r>eqer<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- moħriet; m; 2 -->
    <pardef n="m/oħriet__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oħriet</l>
          <r>oħriet<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ħaret</l>
          <r>oħriet<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- miskin; m; 2 -->
    <pardef n="m/iskin__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iskin</l>
          <r>iskin<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sieken</l>
          <r>iskin<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- pjazza; pjaz; 2 -->
    <pardef n="pjaz/za__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>za</l>
          <r>za<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r>za<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għarbi; għar; 2 -->
    <pardef n="għar/bi__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bi</l>
          <r>bi<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ab</l>
          <r>bi<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- perpura; p; 3 -->
    <pardef n="p/erpura__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erpura</l>
          <r>erpura<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rapar</l>
          <r>erpura<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rieper</l>
          <r>erpura<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sorra; sor; 2 -->
    <pardef n="sor/ra__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>or</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ruħ; r; 2 -->
    <pardef n="r/uħ__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uħ</l>
          <r>uħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wieħ</l>
          <r>uħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- gverta; gv; 2 -->
    <pardef n="gv/erta__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erta</l>
          <r>erta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieret</l>
          <r>erta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sena; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/ena__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ena</l>
          <r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nin</l>
          <r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- zuntier; z; 3 -->
    <pardef n="z/untier__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>untier</l>
          <r>untier<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>natar</l>
          <r>untier<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nieter</l>
          <r>untier<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- liżar; l; 2 -->
    <pardef n="l/iżar__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iżar</l>
          <r>iżar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ożor</l>
          <r>iżar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċorma; ċ; 3 -->
    <pardef n="ċ/orma__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orma</l>
          <r>orma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orom</l>
          <r>orma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rum</l>
          <r>orma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- debbus; d; 2 -->
    <pardef n="d/ebbus__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ebbus</l>
          <r>ebbus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>biebes</l>
          <r>ebbus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- falz; f; 2 -->
    <pardef n="f/alz__adj_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alz</l>
          <r>alz<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oloz</l>
          <r>alz<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- vers; v; 2 -->
    <pardef n="v/ers__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ers</l>
          <r>ers<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rus</l>
          <r>ers<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għalqa; għ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="għ/alqa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alqa</l>
          <r>alqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elieqi</l>
          <r>alqa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġidra; ġ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ġ/idra__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idra</l>
          <r>idra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dur</l>
          <r>idra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- demla; dem; 2 -->
    <pardef n="dem/la__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>la<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- lanza; lan; 2 -->
    <pardef n="lan/za__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>za</l>
          <r>za<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r>za<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- skwerra; skwer; 2 -->
    <pardef n="skwer/ra__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qmis; q; 2 -->
    <pardef n="q/mis__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mis</l>
          <r>mis<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omos</l>
          <r>mis<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- raġel; r; 2 -->
    <pardef n="r/aġel__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aġel</l>
          <r>aġel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ġiel</l>
          <r>aġel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="gerfux"><i>g</i><par n="g/erfux__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="seqer"><i>s</i><par n="s/eqer__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="moħriet"><i>m</i><par n="m/oħriet__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="miskin"><i>m</i><par n="m/iskin__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pjazza"><i>pjaz</i><par n="pjaz/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għarbi"><i>għar</i><par n="għar/bi__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="perpura"><i>p</i><par n="p/erpura__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sorra"><i>sor</i><par n="sor/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ruħ"><i>r</i><par n="r/uħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gverta"><i>gv</i><par n="gv/erta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sena"><i>s</i><par n="s/ena__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="zuntier"><i>z</i><par n="z/untier__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="liżar"><i>l</i><par n="l/iżar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċorma"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/orma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="debbus"><i>d</i><par n="d/ebbus__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="falz"><i>f</i><par n="f/alz__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="vers"><i>v</i><par n="v/ers__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għalqa"><i>għ</i><par n="għ/alqa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġidra"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/idra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="demla"><i>dem</i><par n="dem/la__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="lanza"><i>lan</i><par n="lan/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="skwerra"><i>skwer</i><par n="skwer/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qmis"><i>q</i><par n="q/mis__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="raġel"><i>r</i><par n="r/aġel__n_GD"/></e>
